big-grammar-nostress/big.ur.lexicon.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Masc +Fem d͡ʒ t͡ʃ

LEXICON Root

Adj ;

LEXICON AdjInf

+Masc:0   #;
+Fem:ə    #;

LEXICON Adj
əβəruɣad AdjInf;
əβuɾðəðoɾ AdjInf;
əβɾuzəðoɾ AdjInf;
əβuzəðoɾ AdjInf;
əkəzəɾad AdjInf;
əsətilɛnik AdjInf;
əkləməðoɾ AdjInf;
əkunsəʎəðoɾ AdjInf;
əkɾukarpik AdjInf;
əkuminad AdjInf;
ədditib AdjInf;
ədʒuðikətib AdjInf;
əðurnəðoɾ AdjInf;
ədbəntisi AdjInf;
əeɾuɣɾafik AdjInf;
əfəɲoz AdjInf;
əfləuwtad AdjInf;
əfɾuəməɾikan AdjInf;
əɣəfoz AdjInf;
əɣɔmfi AdjInf;
əɣɾɛŋk AdjInf;
əɣuʎunəðoɾ AdjInf;
əʃəɾupad AdjInf;
ələʎaɾɡ AdjInf;
əlβuminoz AdjInf;
ələziad AdjInf;
əlɣəɾɛz AdjInf;
əʎəuwʒəðoɾ AdjInf;
əltəɾətib AdjInf;
ələntɔjk AdjInf;
əlutiʒən AdjInf;
əlifəɾ AdjInf;
əməzɔnik AdjInf;
əmənurɛjk AdjInf;
əmfisɛlik AdjInf;
əmnɛzik AdjInf;
əmpliətib AdjInf;
ənəkəɾðin AdjInf;
ənəɣliptik AdjInf;
ənəpiɾatik AdjInf;
əndəluz AdjInf;
ənəlɛktɾik AdjInf;
əŋɡlɛz AdjInf;
ənʒɛlik AdjInf;
ənnunaɾi AdjInf;
antənad AdjInf;
antiklastik AdjInf;
antiəspəzmɔðik AdjInf;
antistəminik AdjInf;
antimutəʒɛnik AdjInf;
antiputɾid AdjInf;
antitɾinitaɾi AdjInf;
əntunumastik AdjInf;
əntiðɾum AdjInf;
ənimik AdjInf;
əpərad AdjInf;
əpiləðoɾ AdjInf;
əpukarpik AdjInf;
əpustəmətoz AdjInf;
əpɾuβətɔɾi AdjInf;
əkitanik AdjInf;
əɾβitɾətɔɾi AdjInf;
əɾɛɡ AdjInf;
ərʒəntin AdjInf;
əɾidmɛtik AdjInf;
ərpəʎud AdjInf;
ərəuwʃad AdjInf;
əruseɾ AdjInf;
ərtikulətɔɾi AdjInf;
əskɔɾβik AdjInf;
əzmatik AdjInf;
əsəsin AdjInf;
əsiðu AdjInf;
əstuɾəðoɾ AdjInf;
əzɔmət AdjInf;
ətəɾian AdjInf;
ətɾəβiliaɾi AdjInf;
ətɾɔfik AdjInf;
ətɔmik AdjInf;
əuwzətan AdjInf;
auwtuɣɾafik AdjInf;
auwturəɣɾəsib AdjInf;
əuwksɔtɾuf AdjInf;
əβituəʎəðoɾ AdjInf;
əzutɛmik AdjInf;
bəktəɾiuskɔpik AdjInf;
bəlkanik AdjInf;
bəɲəβaʃ AdjInf;
bəɾβəfluɾid AdjInf;
bəɾðisɛŋk AdjInf;
bəɾitun AdjInf;
bətəðoɾ AdjInf;
beətisim AdjInf;
bəʎuɣəðis AdjInf;
bənəfəktoɾ AdjInf;
bəntɔnik AdjInf;
bərnad AdjInf;
bədzɔl AdjInf;
bikɔnik AdjInf;
biluβad AdjInf;
biuɣɾafik AdjInf;
bikwəðɾad AdjInf;
bisiləb AdjInf;
blənɛŋk AdjInf;
blənad AdjInf;
bokəɣɾɔs AdjInf;
buluɲɛz AdjInf;
buɾðəðoɾ AdjInf;
burətʃon AdjInf;
butəðoɾ AdjInf;
bɾəktəulad AdjInf;
bɾəɡmatik AdjInf;
bɾumətumɛtɾik AdjInf;
bɾusk AdjInf;
buʎəŋɡoz AdjInf;
bustɾufɛðik AdjInf;
bɛdzul AdjInf;
kəkuðilik AdjInf;
kələðis AdjInf;
kald AdjInf;
kəliβoz AdjInf;
kaməsəɣad AdjInf;
kəmizeɾ AdjInf;
kənəleɾ AdjInf;
kəntəðoɾ AdjInf;
kəpəβəʎoz AdjInf;
kəbɡɾos AdjInf;
kaɾəruðon AdjInf;
kəɾəneɣɾ AdjInf;
kəɾðənəlisi AdjInf;
kərminətib AdjInf;
kərəɣoz AdjInf;
kəzmɔɣəm AdjInf;
kətəkɾɛstik AdjInf;
kətətɔnik AdjInf;
kəuwkazik AdjInf;
kəβərnoz AdjInf;
sələβɛrim AdjInf;
sənsətaɾi AdjInf;
səpad AdjInf;
səɾɔtik AdjInf;
siəntifik AdjInf;
sinusɛfəl AdjInf;
sirɔtik AdjInf;
siβilidzəðoɾ AdjInf;
klətəʎud AdjInf;
kluəndad AdjInf;
klastik AdjInf;
kuβərtad AdjInf;
kuətani AdjInf;
kulis AdjInf;
kulumnaɾi AdjInf;
kumbinətɔɾi AdjInf;
kummutəðoɾ AdjInf;
kumplətib AdjInf;
kumpɾumətəðoɾ AdjInf;
kunsəptib AdjInf;
kuŋkɾətib AdjInf;
kumfəksiunəðoɾ AdjInf;
kumfuziuneɾ AdjInf;
kuŋkistəðoɾ AdjInf;
kunsunantik AdjInf;
kuntəmplətib AdjInf;
kuntɾəðiktɔɾi AdjInf;
kumbərtiðoɾ AdjInf;
kupioz AdjInf;
koɾb AdjInf;
kuɾiambik AdjInf;
kurəktib AdjInf;
kursəkəðoɾ AdjInf;
kusteɾ AdjInf;
kɾəpuloz AdjInf;
kɾətasi AdjInf;
kɾiptukɾistəlin AdjInf;
kɾumətuɣɾafik AdjInf;
kɾustoz AdjInf;
kuəβərad AdjInf;
kujtoz AdjInf;
kupulifəɾ AdjInf;
kalid AdjInf;
kɔksik AdjInf;
dəktilɔptəɾ AdjInf;
dərəɾɛŋk AdjInf;
dəsiβɛlik AdjInf;
dəkusad AdjInf;
dəfuliəðoɾ AdjInf;
dəliktib AdjInf;
dəmukɾatik AdjInf;
dɛns AdjInf;
dəpɾəkətɔɾi AdjInf;
dəzəfiəðoɾ AdjInf;
dəzəstɾoz AdjInf;
dəsəntɾəlidzəðoɾ AdjInf;
dəzðəntəɣad AdjInf;
dəsfəβuɾiðoɾ AdjInf;
dəziɡnəðoɾ AdjInf;
dəznəɾid AdjInf;
dəspiətad AdjInf;
dəstəɲiðoɾ AdjInf;
dəzɛrtik AdjInf;
dəkstɾad AdjInf;
diəɡnɔstik AdjInf;
diərɛjk AdjInf;
dikutɔmik AdjInf;
difɾəktib AdjInf;
dilətətib AdjInf;
diusəzan AdjInf;
diɾəktoɾ AdjInf;
diʒuntib AdjInf;
disəkəðoɾ AdjInf;
distɾɔfik AdjInf;
diβulɣəðoɾ AdjInf;
duðəkətɔnik AdjInf;
duminik AdjInf;
dɾəkunitik AdjInf;
dɾuiðik AdjInf;
dɛrmik AdjInf;
əkulɔʒik AdjInf;
əðukətib AdjInf;
əjβisɛŋk AdjInf;
əlɛktɾuəkustik AdjInf;
əlɛktɾutɛɡnik AdjInf;
əlʃan AdjInf;
əmbulikəðoɾ AdjInf;
əmbɾutəðis AdjInf;
əmmətɾɔpik AdjInf;
əmplastik AdjInf;
əŋkəβuɾiəðoɾ AdjInf;
ənsiklupɛðik AdjInf;
əndark AdjInf;
ənduɣamik AdjInf;
əmfiləðis AdjInf;
ənʒipunəðoɾ AdjInf;
əɲʎətɾad AdjInf;
ənruβad AdjInf;
əntəʎəðoɾ AdjInf;
entɾəβəŋkoz AdjInf;
əmbəʎiðoɾ AdjInf;
ənɔfil AdjInf;
əpiʒin AdjInf;
əɾəktoɾ AdjInf;
əzβərəʎad AdjInf;
əskərniðoɾ AdjInf;
əskumbɾəðoɾ AdjInf;
əsfiɡmik AdjInf;
əspəyoz AdjInf;
əspəsəiðoɾ AdjInf;
əskəʎeɾ AdjInf;
əstətɔɾik AdjInf;
əstiɾɛnik AdjInf;
əstuðiəntin AdjInf;
ətɾusk AdjInf;
əβulutib AdjInf;
əɡzələtɔɾi AdjInf;
əksplətib AdjInf;
əkstɾəktib AdjInf;
fəeðoɾ AdjInf;
fəɾinʒi AdjInf;
fəðəɾətib AdjInf;
fəɾin AdjInf;
fiβɾilad AdjInf;
filunian AdjInf;
fiksətib AdjInf;
fluskuloz AdjInf;
funumɛtɾik AdjInf;
fusilifəɾ AdjInf;
fɾətɛrn AdjInf;
fɾunteɾ AdjInf;
fulmini AdjInf;
falik AdjInf;
ɡəʎɔf AdjInf;
ɡəɾβəʎəðoɾ AdjInf;
ʒəɣənteɾ AdjInf;
ʒənɛɾik AdjInf;
ʒəstoɾ AdjInf;
ɡləndiβuɾ AdjInf;
ɡnumɔnik AdjInf;
ɡɾəfitik AdjInf;
ɡɾəweɾ AdjInf;
ɡɾuɣison AdjInf;
ɡinəweɾ AdjInf;
əβəðoɾ AdjInf;
əmuraʒik AdjInf;
əsian AdjInf;
əɡzandɾ AdjInf;
iðɾɔfən AdjInf;
ipukuristik AdjInf;
istɔʒən AdjInf;
umusinɛtik AdjInf;
uspitəleɾ AdjInf;
iktiulɔʒik AdjInf;
ilərʒɛt AdjInf;
imməðuɾ AdjInf;
impəɾipinnad AdjInf;
impɾəsiz AdjInf;
inəpɾɛz AdjInf;
iŋkunəɣud AdjInf;
indəsiz AdjInf;
induiɾanik AdjInf;
inəksplikad AdjInf;
imfɾəskɾit AdjInf;
inʒust AdjInf;
inskɾiptoɾ AdjInf;
insipid AdjInf;
intɛrn AdjInf;
intɾuβərtid AdjInf;
yuðoz AdjInf;
izuβaɾik AdjInf;
izrəelyan AdjInf;
ʒəməjkan AdjInf;
ʒuðikətib AdjInf;
ləβuɾioz AdjInf;
laps AdjInf;
ləpiðubblastik AdjInf;
liɣulifloɾ AdjInf;
litinik AdjInf;
ʎəstimoz AdjInf;
ʎənəɣoz AdjInf;
ʎimoz AdjInf;
luβad AdjInf;
laŋɡid AdjInf;
məðɾəpɔɾik AdjInf;
məjmon AdjInf;
maləβiŋɡud AdjInf;
malɣustoz AdjInf;
malβərsəðoɾ AdjInf;
mənsɔy AdjInf;
məɾin AdjInf;
mətinəðoɾ AdjInf;
məɣəlɔmən AdjInf;
mənupauzik AdjInf;
məzəntɛɾik AdjInf;
mətalutəɾapik AdjInf;
mətɔpik AdjInf;
milimətɾad AdjInf;
misədʒeɾ AdjInf;
muðəɾətib AdjInf;
muŋɡɔl AdjInf;
monurim AdjInf;
muɾəβian AdjInf;
musad AdjInf;
multipərtid AdjInf;
muzəulɔʒik AdjInf;
musik AdjInf;
nəβərɛz AdjInf;
nəɣɾeɾ AdjInf;
nəptunik AdjInf;
niðuɾoz AdjInf;
nunad AdjInf;
nusifəɾ AdjInf;
uβlətib AdjInf;
uksitan AdjInf;
ufənsib AdjInf;
uliβaɾi AdjInf;
upəlin AdjInf;
uɾðənəðoɾ AdjInf;
urnitɔfil AdjInf;
ɔsi AdjInf;
uksalik AdjInf;
pəleartik AdjInf;
pəŋkɾeatik AdjInf;
pəɾəfɾastik AdjInf;
pəɾənɛtik AdjInf;
pəsədʒeɾ AdjInf;
pəuwtad AdjInf;
pələðoɾ AdjInf;
pəntəziləb AdjInf;
pəɾiʒin AdjInf;
pərsan AdjInf;
pətɾuleɾ AdjInf;
piɡnuɾətib AdjInf;
piɾətɔʒən AdjInf;
pidʒəðoɾ AdjInf;
plətʃəɾioz AdjInf;
pluʒan AdjInf;
pɔliətɔmik AdjInf;
pɔlipɾɔtik AdjInf;
pulitik AdjInf;
purtuaɾi AdjInf;
pɾəɡmatik AdjInf;
pɾəmsəðoɾ AdjInf;
pɾətuɾian AdjInf;
pɾusəloz AdjInf;
pɾulifik AdjInf;
pɾɔpilik AdjInf;
pɾuβinsian AdjInf;
psikumɛtɾik AdjInf;
puntoz AdjInf;
pɛndul AdjInf;
kwəlitətib AdjInf;
kimuɣɾafik AdjInf;
rəsɛmik AdjInf;
rəpiðoɾ AdjInf;
rəβətəðoɾ AdjInf;
rəkunstituiðoɾ AdjInf;
rəfəɾəndaɾi AdjInf;
rəʒistɾəðoɾ AdjInf;
rəmətəðoɾ AdjInf;
rəumɛtɾik AdjInf;
rəpɾimiðoɾ AdjInf;
rəsəɣɔt AdjInf;
rətɾuβəðoɾ AdjInf;
rik AdjInf;
ruɣətib AdjInf;
rusəʎunɛz AdjInf;
rutənoz AdjInf;
səβatik AdjInf;
sələβɾoz AdjInf;
sənəʒəðoɾ AdjInf;
səɾðɔnik AdjInf;
səkəɾðinɛŋk AdjInf;
sələksiunəðoɾ AdjInf;
sɛmiβitɾifikad AdjInf;
səɾənisim AdjInf;
siβəɾian AdjInf;
simfizandɾ AdjInf;
sinərʒɛtik AdjInf;
sistaltik AdjInf;
sɔl AdjInf;
sumniəðoɾ AdjInf;
surud AdjInf;
suβəstəðoɾ AdjInf;
subbərsoɾ AdjInf;
sulfuɾi AdjInf;
supləntəðoɾ AdjInf;
salik AdjInf;
təjβənɛz AdjInf;
tərəɣunin AdjInf;
təɣuməntaɾi AdjInf;
təmpuɾidzəðoɾ AdjInf;
təɾβulɛŋk AdjInf;
tərɛŋk AdjInf;
tətɾəɛðɾik AdjInf;
tipulituɣɾafik AdjInf;
tupəðis AdjInf;
tusəðoɾ AdjInf;
tɾənsfəɾiðoɾ AdjInf;
tɾəuwmatik AdjInf;
tɾiβutəðoɾ AdjInf;
tɾinəɾβad AdjInf;
tɾuɣlɔβi AdjInf;
tuʃəɣoz AdjInf;
tannik AdjInf;
ufan AdjInf;
ulɔtɾik AdjInf;
uniβuk AdjInf;
uzβek AdjInf;
bəlβad AdjInf;
bəʎaɾd AdjInf;
bəɾðoz AdjInf;
bəskoz AdjInf;
biɣətan AdjInf;
birtuoz AdjInf;
bukalik AdjInf;
biɾik AdjInf;
ʃəβɾunad AdjInf;
ʃur AdjInf;
aɣlif AdjInf;
izmik AdjInf;
